Colorado, session 2026A, SB060.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 2 to article 43
of title 25 as follows:
PART 2
YOUTH ATHLETIC COACH
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

MENTAL HEALTH EDUCATION
25-43-201. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS PART 2 IS "ALYSSA'S YOUTH CONCUSSION
AND MENTAL HEALTH PROTECTION ACT" OR "ALYSSA'S ACT".
25-43-202. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 2, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(1) "PUBLIC RECREATION FACILITY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 25-43-102.
(2) "YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 25-43-102.
25-43-203. Organized school athletic activities - mental health
guidelines required.
(1) (a) EACH PUBLIC AND PRIVATE MIDDLE SCHOOL, JUNIOR HIGH
SCHOOL, AND HIGH SCHOOL SHALL REQUIRE EACH COACH OF A YOUTH
ATHLETIC ACTIVITY TO COMPLETE A BIENNIAL MENTAL HEALTH EDUCATION
COURSE.
(b) EACH PRIVATE CLUB OR PUBLIC RECREATION FACILITY AND EACH
ATHLETIC LEAGUE THAT SPONSORS YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITIES SHALL
REQUIRE EACH COACH WITH WHOM A CLUB, FACILITY, OR LEAGUE DIRECTLY
CONTRACTS WITH, FORMALLY ENGAGES, OR EMPLOYS TO COACH A YOUTH
ATHLETIC ACTIVITY TO COMPLETE A BIENNIAL MENTAL HEALTH EDUCATION
COURSE.
(2) (a) THE MENTAL HEALTH EDUCATION COURSE REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION MUST INCLUDE INFORMATION REGARDING
THE FOLLOWING:
(I) A COACH'S IMPACT ON THE MENTAL HEALTH OF YOUTH ATHLETES;
(II) A WELLNESS FRAMEWORK FOR YOUTH ATHLETES;
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-060

(III) STRESS, ANXIETY DISORDERS, AND DEPRESSION;
(IV) TRAUMA;
(V) SUBSTANCE ABUSE; AND
(VI) SUICIDE PREVENTION.
(b) THE MENTAL HEALTH EDUCATION COURSE MAY BE HELD IN
CONJUNCTION WITH THE CONCUSSION RECOGNITION EDUCATION COURSE
REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 25-43-103 (1)(a).
(c) AN ORGANIZATION OR ASSOCIATION THAT A SCHOOL OR SCHOOL
DISTRICT IS A MEMBER OF MAY DESIGNATE SPECIFIC EDUCATION COURSES AS
SUFFICIENT TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF
THIS SECTION.
(3) IF A YOUTH ATHLETE IS REMOVED FROM PLAY FOR A SUSPECTED
CONCUSSION, THE YOUTH ATHLETE'S COACH OR THE CLUB'S, LEAGUE'S, OR
PUBLIC RECREATION FACILITY'S OTHER DESIGNATED PERSONNEL SHALL
NOTIFY THE ATHLETE'S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN AND ADVISE THAT THE
ATHLETE SEEK EVALUATION FROM A LICENSED HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER FOR
APPROPRIATE MEDICAL AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH GUIDANCE REGARDING
POTENTIAL PHYSICAL, COGNITIVE, OR PSYCHOLOGICAL SYMPTOMS
ASSOCIATED WITH A CONCUSSION.
(4) NOTHING IN THIS PART 2 ABROGATES OR LIMITS THE
PROTECTIONS APPLICABLE TO PUBLIC ENTITIES AND PUBLIC EMPLOYEES
ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO THE "COLORADO GOVERNMENTAL IMMUNITY
ACT", ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE 24; VOLUNTEERS AND BOARD MEMBERS AND
NONPROFIT DIRECTORS, OFFICERS, AND TRUSTEES DESCRIBED PURSUANT TO
SECTIONS 13-21-115.7 AND 13-21-116; OR SKI AREA OPERATORS PROTECTED
PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 33-44-112 AND 33-44-113.
(5) AN ATHLETIC COACH OF A YOUTH ATHLETIC ACTIVITY WHO IS
NOT ENTITLED TO ANY OF THE PROTECTIONS PRESERVED IN SUBSECTION (4)
OF THIS SECTION AND WHO ACTS IN GOOD FAITH TO COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS PART 2 IS NOT SUBJECT TO CIVIL LIABILITY FOR ANY
ACT OR OMISSION RELATED TO THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS PART 2 UNLESS
THE ACT OR OMISSION CONSTITUTES GROSS NEGLIGENCE OR WILLFUL AND
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-060

WANTON MISCONDUCT.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 25-43-101 as
follows:
25-43-101. Short title.
This article PART 1 shall be known and may be cited as the "Jake
Snakenberg Youth Concussion Act".
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-43-102, amend the
introductory portion as follows:
25-43-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 43 PART 1, unless the context otherwise
requires:
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-43-103, amend (5)
as follows:
25-43-103. Organized school athletic activities - concussion
guidelines required.
(5) Nothing in this article PART 1 abrogates or limits the protections
applicable to public entities and public employees pursuant to the "Colorado
Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24; C.R.S.; volunteers and
board members pursuant to sections 13-21-115.7 and 13-21-116; C.R.S.; or
ski area operators pursuant to sections 33-44-112 and 33-44-113. C.R.S.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-060

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-060